Utah statutes.
13-1a-5.   Authority of director.
The director has authority:
(1)  to make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to administer the responsibilities of the
division;
(2)  to investigate, upon complaint, the corporation and commercial code
filings and compliance governed by the laws administered and enforced by the
division; and
(3)  under the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Utah Administrative
Procedures Act, to take administrative action against persons in violation of
the division rules and the laws administered by it, including the issuance of
cease and desist orders.
